Massachusetts, session 194th, H2213.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 51 ½ of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking subsection (d) in its entirety and inserting the following
thereof:-
(d) If a person has received a substance abuse evaluation and returns to an acute care
hospital or emergency satellite facility within seven days of receipt of such evaluation suffering
from an opiate-related overdose or has recently been administered naloxone, the attending
physician may authorize the restraint of such person and apply for the treatment of such person
for a 3-day period at a facility authorized for such purposes by the department of public health or
the department of mental health.
of 1